Tennessee, session 114, HB2626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28 of the Private Acts of 1997; and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by deleting SECTION 8 and substituting:
SECTION 8. Collection of the tax herein levied shall be determined by the
governing body of Cheatham County in accordance with Section 5 of this act. Proceeds
from the tax levied herein shall be deposited into the county general fund and used as
follows:
(1) Forty-six and sixty-seven one hundredths percent (46.67%) of the tax
shall be deposited into the Cheatham County Education Debt Service Fund;
(2) Forty-six and sixty-seven one hundredths percent (46.67%) of the tax
shall be deposited into the Cheatham County Education Debt Service Fund and
accounted for separately as a reserve fund to pay debt relating to financing the
acquisition, construction, or reconstruction of school buildings; and
(3) Six and sixty-six one hundredths percent (6.66%) of the tax shall be
deposited into the Cheatham County Highway/Public Works Fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Cheatham County. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed by
the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB2626
010634
- 1 -